Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 3
Labor Relations and Practices

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

11-3-101. Soliciting advertising in name of labor organization.

Any person, firm, or corporation soliciting advertising in the State of Arkansas in the name of, on behalf of, or claiming to represent bona fide labor organizations shall, prior to the soliciting thereof, file with the Secretary of State a surety bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned that the person, firm, or corporation will well and truly perform any and all contracts entered into between the person, firm, or corporation and any person, firm, or corporation within the state.

The person, firm, or corporation shall further file with the Secretary of State credentials from the organization the person, firm, or corporation represents, signed by the president and secretary and bearing the official seal of the organization.

The bond shall be for the benefit of any person, firm, or corporation who or which has failed to receive any advertising contracted for.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the person, firm, or corporation shall be fined in any sum not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Acts 1941, No. 294, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 71-201, 71-202; 2003, No. 1473, § 22.

Subchapter 2
— Hiring Practices

Effective Dates.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 10: effective on passage.

Acts 1905, No. 214, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1905, No. 298, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1923 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 34, § 2: approved Oct. 20, 1923. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1951, No. 171, § 3: Feb. 27, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, scores of citizens of this State are daily being required and forced to expend personal funds for physical examinations by persons, firms, partnerships, associations and corporations as a prerequisite to employment or continued employment; and whereas, it is inequitable and unjust to place this financial expense upon the applicant since the benefit from such examination flows substantially to said persons, firms, partnerships and corporations; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-3-201. Enticing away laborer prohibited — Penalty.

If any person shall interfere with, entice away, knowingly employ, or induce a laborer who has contracted with another person for a specified time to leave his or her employer before the expiration of his or her contract without the consent of the employer, then, upon conviction before any justice of the peace or circuit court, he or she shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

In addition, he or she shall be liable to the employer for all advances made by him or her to the laborer by virtue of his or her contract, whether verbal or written, with the laborer and for all damages that he or she may have sustained by reason thereof.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 8, p. 167; 1905, No. 298, § 1, p. 726; C. & M. Dig., § 2789; Acts 1923 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 34, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 3493; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-210.

11-3-202. False statements or blacklists to prevent employment prohibited.

In this state, every person who shall send or deliver, make or cause to be made for the purpose of being delivered or sent, part with the possession of any paper, letter, or writing, with or without a name signed thereto, sign with a fictitious name, or with any letter, mark, or other designation, or publish or cause to be published any false statement for the purpose of preventing another person from obtaining employment in this state or elsewhere shall, upon conviction, be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor.

Every person who shall blacklist any person by writing, printing, or publishing, or causing any of these things to be done, the name or any mark or designation representing the name of any person in any paper, pamphlet, circular, or book, together with any false statement concerning the person so named, or shall publish that anyone is a member of any secret organization, for the purpose of preventing that other person from securing employment, shall upon conviction be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall do any of the things mentioned in this section for the purpose of causing the discharge of any person employed by any railroad or other company, corporation, or individual shall upon conviction be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person convicted shall be fined in the sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned in the county jail for twelve (12) months, or both fined and imprisoned.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 214, § 1, p. 545; C. & M. Dig., § 7135; Pope's Dig., § 9121; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-211.

11-3-203. Medical examination as condition for employment.

It is unlawful for any person, partnership, association, or corporation, either for himself or herself or in a representative or fiduciary capacity, to require any employee or applicant for employment, as a condition of employment or continued employment, to submit to or take a physical, medical examination, or drug test unless the physical, medical examination, or drug test is provided at no cost to the employee or applicant for employment and unless a true and correct copy, either original or duplicate original, of the examiner's report of the physical, medical examination, or drug test is furnished free of charge to the applicant or employee upon a written request of the applicant or employee.

It shall further be unlawful for any person, partnership, association, or corporation to require any employee or applicant for employment to pay, either directly or indirectly, any part of the cost of the physical, medical examination, drug test, report, or copy of the report.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if an employee tests positive for an illegal drug as defined by rule of the Division of Labor, the employer and employee may agree in writing who will bear the cost of future drug tests or screens required as a condition of continued employment.

Each and every violation of any provision of subsection (a) of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine in any amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

The Director of the Division of Labor shall administer and enforce this section, including without limitation, by:

Adopting administrative rules; and

Demanding payment and seeking recovery in a court of competent jurisdiction for charges, fees, wage deductions, or other payments made by employees as a result of an employer's violation of this section.

This section does not change the definition of “medical examination” under any other state or federal statute.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 171, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-212, 81-213; Acts 2009, No. 453, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 980, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5305, 5306.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “physical, medical examination, or drug test” for “examination” twice in (a)(1) and in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a)(3); and substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language of (c).

11-3-204. Providing references to prospective employers.

A current or former employer may disclose the following information about a current or former employee's employment history to a prospective employer of the current or former employee upon receipt of written consent from the current or former employee:

Date and duration of employment;

Current pay rate and wage history;

Job description and duties;

The last written performance evaluation prepared prior to the date of the request;

Attendance information;

Results of drug or alcohol tests administered within one (1) year prior to the request;

Threats of violence, harassing acts, or threatening behavior related to the workplace or directed at another employee;

Whether the employee was voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment and the reasons for the separation; and

Whether the employee is eligible for rehire.

A school district or an officer, an agent, a servant, or an employee of a school district may disclose the information under subdivision (a)(1)(A)-(I) of this section and any additional information that may have some bearing upon the hiring of a current or former employee by a school district with or without the written consent of the current or former employee.

The current or former employer disclosing the information is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from civil liability for the disclosure or any consequences of the disclosure unless the presumption of good faith is rebutted upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the information disclosed by the current or former employer was false, and the current or former employer had knowledge of its falsity or acted with malice or reckless disregard for the truth.

The current or former employer disclosing the information may present the information in a format convenient to the current or former employer, including any electronic format.

The consent required in subsection (a) of this section shall be on a separate form from the application form or, if included in the application form, shall be in bold letters and in larger typeface than the largest typeface in the text of the application form.

The consent form shall state, at a minimum, language similar to the following:

The consent shall be signed and dated by the applicant.

The consent shall be valid only for the length of time that the application is considered active by the prospective employer.

If the applicant is hired and remains with the new employer for longer than six (6) months, the consent shall be valid for no longer than six (6) months.

If the applicant is hired and remains with the new employer for less than six (6) months, the consent shall be valid for six (6) months after the termination of employment.

The provisions of this section shall also apply to any current or former employee, agent, or other representative of the current or former employer who is authorized to provide and who provides information in accordance with the provisions of this section.

This section does not require any prospective employer to request employment history on a prospective employee and does not require any current or former employer to disclose employment history to any prospective employer.

Except as specifically amended herein, the common law of this state remains unchanged as it relates to providing employment information on present and former employees.

This section shall apply only to causes of action accruing on and after July 30, 1999.

The immunity conferred by this section shall not apply when an employer or prospective employer discriminates or retaliates against an employee because the employee or the prospective employee has exercised or is believed to have exercised any federal or state statutory right or undertaken any action encouraged by the public policy of this state.

“I,

(applicant)

, hereby give consent to any and all prior employers of mine to provide information with regard to my employment with prior employers to

(prospective employer)

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1474, §§ 1-5; 2013, No. 1039, § 1; 2015, No. 949, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted present (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment added (a)(4); redesignated former (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A) and (B); and rewrote (b)(3).

11-3-205. Private employers — Leave for bone marrow or organ donation — Withholding tax credit.

As used in this section:

“Bone marrow donor” means a person from whose body bone marrow is taken to be transferred to the body of another person;

“Organ” means a human organ that is capable of being transferred from the body of a person to the body of another person, including eyes;

“Organ donor” means a person from whose body an organ is taken to be transferred to the body of another person; and

“Private employer” means a sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity with one (1) or more employees.

“Private employer” does not include a municipality, county, state agency, institution of higher education, or other public employer.

In addition to any medical, personal, or other paid leave provided by the employer, a private employer shall grant an employee an unpaid leave of absence to allow the employee to serve as an organ donor or a bone marrow donor if the employee requests a leave of absence in writing.

The length of the leave of absence shall be equal to the time requested by the employee or ninety (90) days, whichever is less.

A private employer may grant a paid or unpaid leave of absence for a length of time greater than ninety (90) days.

If a private employer agrees to pay the employee's regular salary or wages during the leave of absence required under subsection (b) of this section, then the private employer is entitled to a credit against the private employer's Arkansas withholding tax liability.

The amount of the credit provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the regular salary or wages paid to the employee while the employee was on a leave of absence required under subsection (b) of this section.

However, if the private employer grants the employee a leave of absence greater than ninety (90) days, the credit provided under this subsection shall be limited to the regular salary or wages paid during the first ninety (90) days of the leave of absence.

The credit shall be taken within one (1) year of the date upon which the leave required under subsection (b) of this section begins.

This section shall not apply if the employee is eligible for leave under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2235, § 1.

11-3-206. Copies of employee background checks.

Upon the request of an employee or an applicant for employment, an employer that receives background check information regarding an employee or an applicant for employment shall provide a copy of the background check information to the employee or applicant for employment.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1028, § 1.

Subchapter 3
— Right to Work

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1947, No. 101, § 5, provided that that act would not apply to existing contracts, but would apply to any renewals or extensions thereof.

Cross References.

Rights of labor, Ark. Const. Amend. 34.

11-3-301. Policy.

Freedom of organized labor to bargain collectively and freedom of unorganized labor to bargain individually is declared to be the public policy of the state under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 34.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 101, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-201.

11-3-302. Enforcement.

The power and duty to enforce this subchapter is conferred upon and vested in the circuit court of the county in which any person, group of persons, firm, corporation, unincorporated association, labor organization, or representatives thereof who violate this subchapter, or any part hereof, reside or have a place of business or may be found and served with process.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 101, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-204.

11-3-303. Union affiliation or nonaffiliation not to be condition of employment.

No person shall be denied employment because of membership in or affiliation with a labor union, nor shall any person be denied employment because of failure or refusal to join or affiliate with a labor union, nor shall any person, unless he or she shall voluntarily consent in writing to do so, be compelled to pay dues or any other monetary consideration to any labor organization as a prerequisite to, condition of, or continuance of employment.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 101, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-202.

11-3-304. Contracts to exclude persons from employment prohibited.

No person, group of persons, firm, corporation, association, or labor organization shall enter into any contract to exclude from employment:

Persons who are members of, or affiliated with, a labor union;

Persons who are not members of, or who fail or refuse to join or affiliate with, a labor union; and

Persons who, having joined a labor union, have resigned their membership or have been discharged, expelled, or excluded.

Any person, group of persons, firm, corporation, association, labor organization, or representatives thereof, either for themselves or others, who sign, approve, or enter into a contract contrary to the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the person, group of persons, firm, corporation, association, labor organization, or representatives thereof, shall be fined in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Each day that the unlawful contract is given effect, or in any manner complied with, shall be deemed a separate offense and shall be punishable as such as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 101, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-203, 81-204.

Subchapter 4
— Labor Disputes

Cross References.

State police not to perform duties on private property in connection with strikes or lockouts, § 12-8-106.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-3-401. Prevention of lawful employment prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person by the use or threat of the use of force or violence to prevent or attempt to prevent any person from engaging in any lawful vocation within this state.

Any person guilty of violating this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be punished by confinement in the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than two (2) years.

It shall be unlawful for any person acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons to assemble at or near any place where a labor dispute exists and by force or violence prevent or attempt to prevent any person from engaging in any lawful vocation.

It shall also be unlawful for any person acting either by himself or herself or as a member of any group or organization or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons to promote, encourage, or aid any such unlawful assemblage.

Any person guilty of violating this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by confinement in the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than two (2) years.

The term “labor dispute” as used in this section shall include any controversy between an employer and two (2) or more employees concerning the terms or conditions of employment or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment.

The provisions of this section shall be cumulative of all other existing criminal laws of this state upon the same subject, and in the event of a conflict between existing articles and the provisions of this section, then and in that event, the provisions, offenses, and punishments set forth herein shall prevail over the existing articles.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 193, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-206 — 81-209; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 694, 695.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Corrections” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(2) and (b)(3).

11-3-402. Interference with railroad engines and employees prohibited.

Where a labor union or striking employees are picketing, or causing to be picketed, the premises or approach to the premises of any employer which is not a railroad, it shall be unlawful for any persons to stand upon the track or in the way or otherwise interfere with, prevent, delay, forbid, or obstruct by force or threats the progress of any railroad engine, train, or cars operated by a railroad common carrier in the performance of its common carrier duties and moving from, to, or past the premises.

Where any labor union or striking employees are picketing, or causing to be picketed, the premises or approach to the premises of an employer which is not a railroad, it shall be unlawful for any person, through intimidation, picketing, or otherwise intentionally to induce or persuade, or to seek to induce or persuade, any employees of a railroad not to enter, leave, or pass the premises with any railroad engine, train, or cars operated by a railroad in the performance of its common carrier duties.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a time not to exceed six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

In addition to the penalty provisions of this section, it shall be the duty of any court of competent jurisdiction at the instance of any party adversely affected by a violation of this section to enforce the provisions by restraining orders and injunction.

Anyone conspiring with others to cause a violation of this section shall be liable in a civil action for damages.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 257, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-214 — 81-217.